Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-255
School and federal lands; exchange; lessee's interest; release; condemnation; procedure.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds is further authorized to secure from the holders of any leases of any educational lands lying in any federal forest reserve, surrenders, relinquishments, or cancellation of such leases. If the board and the holder of any such leases cannot agree upon the terms for such surrender, relinquishment, or cancellation, the board may take over the interest of such holder by the exercise of the power of eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1917, c. 212, § 3, p. 520;

C.S.1922, § 5213;

C.S.1929, § 72-233;

R.S.1943, § 72-255;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 111, p. 499;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 43.

State may condemn leasehold for forest reserve. State of Nebraska v. United States, 164 F.2d 866 (8th Cir. 1947).